Washington statutes.
RCW 41.54.080

Benefits under chapter—Contractual rights not established.

The benefits provided under RCW 41.54.010 through 41.54.070 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right and the legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to a member's retirement.

[ 1987 c 192 s 8.]